Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB2117.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 1401 of the act of March 10, 1949 (P.L.30, No.14), known as the Public School Code of 1949, is amended by adding clauses to read:Section 1401. Definitions.--As used in this article--* * *(17) "Epinephrine delivery system" means a device approved by the United States Food and Drug Administration that contains a premeasured dose of epinephrine and is used to administer 1234567891011121314151617181920 epinephrine into the human body to prevent or treat a life-threatening allergic reaction.(18) "Short-acting asthma medication" means any medication approved by the United States Food and Drug Administration, including a beta-2 agonist or bronchodilator, used for the quick relief of asthma symptoms, including:(i) an orally inhaled medication that contains a premeasured single dose of albuterol or albuterol sulfate delivered by a nebulizer compressor device; and(ii) a pressurized, metered-dose inhaler used to treat asthma or respiratory distress, including wheezing, shortness of breath and difficulty breathing.Section 2. Sections 1414.1 heading, (a) and (b), 1414.2 and 1414.9 heading and (1) introductory paragraph of the act are amended to read:Section 1414.1. Possession and Use of [Asthma Inhalers] Short-Acting Asthma Medications and Epinephrine [Auto-Injectors] Delivery Systems.--(a) Each school entity shall develop a written policy to allow for the possession and self-administration by children of school age of [asthma inhalers] short-acting asthma medications and epinephrine [auto-injectors] delivery systems, and the prescribed medication to be administered thereby, in a school setting. The policy shall comply with section 504 of the Rehabilitation Act of 1973 (Public Law 93-112, 29 U.S.C. § 794) and 22 Pa. Code Ch. 15 (relating to protected handicapped students). The policy shall be distributed with the code of student conduct required under 22 Pa. Code § 12.3(c) (relating to school rules) and made available on the school entity's publicly accessible Internet website, if any.20260HB2117PN3493 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (b) The policy under this section shall require a child of school age that desires to possess and self-administer [an asthma inhaler] a short-acting asthma medication or epinephrine [auto-injector] delivery system in a school setting to demonstrate the capability for self-administration and for responsible behavior in the use thereof and to notify the school nurse immediately following each use of [an asthma inhaler] a short-acting asthma medication or epinephrine [auto-injector] delivery system. The school entity shall develop a system whereby the child may demonstrate competency to the school nurse that the child is capable of self-administration and has permission for carrying and taking the medication through the use of the [asthma inhaler] short-acting asthma medication or epinephrine [auto-injector] delivery system. Determination of competency for self-administration shall be based on age, cognitive function, maturity and demonstration of responsible behavior. The school entity shall also restrict the availability of the [asthma inhaler] short-acting asthma medication, the epinephrine [auto-injector] delivery system and the prescribed medication contained therein from other children of school age. The policy shall specify conditions under which a student may lose the privilege to self-carry the [asthma inhaler] short-acting asthma medication, the epinephrine [auto-injector] delivery system and the medication if the school policies are abused or ignored. A school entity that prevents a student from self-carrying [an asthma inhaler] a short-acting asthma medication or epinephrine [auto-injector] delivery system and the prescribed medication shall ensure that they are appropriately stored at locations in close proximity to the student prohibited from self-carrying and notify the student's 20260HB2117PN3493 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 classroom teachers of the places where the [asthma inhaler] short-acting asthma medication or epinephrine [auto-injector] delivery system and medication are to be stored and the means to access them.* * *Section 1414.2. School Access to Emergency Epinephrine and Short-Acting Asthma Medications.--(a) Subject to [subsection (g)] subsections (g) and (h.1), a school entity or nonpublic school may authorize a trained school employe to:(1) provide an epinephrine [auto-injector] delivery system or short-acting asthma medication that meets the prescription on file for either the individual student or the school entity or nonpublic school to a student who is authorized to self-administer an epinephrine [auto-injector] delivery system or short-acting asthma medication;(2) administer to a student an epinephrine [auto-injector] delivery system or short-acting asthma medication that meets the prescription on file for either the individual student or the school entity or nonpublic school; and(3) administer an epinephrine [auto-injector] delivery system or short-acting asthma medication that meets the prescription on file for the school entity or nonpublic school to a student that the employe in good faith believes to be having an anaphylactic reaction or asthma episode.(b) Notwithstanding section 11 of the act of April 14, 1972 (P.L.233, No.64), known as "The Controlled Substance, Drug, Device and Cosmetic Act," a physician or certified registered nurse practitioner may prescribe epinephrine [auto-injectors] delivery systems or short-acting asthma medications and a pharmacist may dispense epinephrine delivery systems or short-20260HB2117PN3493 - 4 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 acting asthma medications in the name of the school entity or nonpublic school to be maintained for use pursuant to subsection (a).(b.1) A physician or nurse practitioner who prescribes epinephrine delivery systems or short-acting asthma medications or a pharmacist who dispenses epinephrine delivery systems or short-acting asthma medications under subsection (b) shall not be liable for any civil damages as a result of its use under subsection (a), except in any act or omission intentionally designed to harm or any grossly negligent acts or omissions by the physician, nurse practitioner or a pharmacist which results in harm to a student.(c) A school entity or nonpublic school may maintain at a school in a safe, secure location a supply of epinephrine [auto-injectors] delivery systems or short-acting asthma medications.(d) A school entity or nonpublic school that authorizes the provision of epinephrine [auto-injectors] delivery systems or short-acting asthma medications under this section shall designate one or more individuals at each school who shall be responsible for the storage and use of the epinephrine [auto-injectors] delivery systems or short-acting asthma medications.(e) [Individuals] Subject to subsection (h.1), individuals who are responsible for the storage and use of epinephrine [auto-injectors] delivery systems or short-acting asthma medications must successfully complete [a training program that shall be developed and implemented by the Department of Health within ninety (90) days of the effective date of this section] AN ONLINE COURSE OF INSTRUCTION OR IN-PERSON TRAINING APPROVED BY THE DEPARTMENT OF HEALTH.(f) (1) An epinephrine [auto-injector] delivery system or 20260HB2117PN3493 - 5 - <--<--123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 short-acting asthma medication from the school entity's or nonpublic school's supply of epinephrine [auto-injectors] delivery systems or short-acting asthma medications that meets the prescription on file for the school entity or nonpublic school may be provided to and utilized by a student authorized to self-administer or, subject to subsection (h.1), may be administered by a trained school employe authorized to administer an epinephrine [auto-injector] delivery system or short-acting asthma medication to a student pursuant to subsection (a).(2) [When] Subject to subsection (h.1), when a student does not have an epinephrine [auto-injector] delivery system or short-acting asthma medication or a prescription for an epinephrine [auto-injector] delivery system or short-acting asthma medication on file, a trained school employe may utilize the school entity's or nonpublic school's supply of epinephrine [auto-injectors] delivery systems or short-acting asthma medications to respond to anaphylactic reaction or asthma episode under a standing protocol from a physician or certified registered nurse practitioner and as provided in this section.(f.1) In the event a student is believed to be having an anaphylactic reaction or asthma episode, the school nurse or an individual in the school who is responsible for the storage and use of epinephrine [auto-injectors] delivery systems or short-acting asthma medications shall contact 911 as soon as possible.(g) At the request of a parent or legal guardian, a student shall be exempt from subsections (a), (f) and (h). The principal of the school in which the student is enrolled shall notify all parents or legal guardians of their ability to exempt their children from subsections (a), (f) and (h) by returning a signed 20260HB2117PN3493 - 6 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 opt-out form.(h) The provisions of 42 Pa.C.S. §§ 8332 (relating to emergency response provider and bystander good Samaritan civil immunity) and 8337.1 (relating to civil immunity of school officers or employees relating to emergency care, first aid and rescue) shall apply to a person who administers an epinephrine [auto-injector] delivery system or short-acting asthma medication pursuant to this section.(h.1) The following shall apply:(1) A school employe who is not a licensed health care practitioner shall not provide or administer short-acting asthma medication to a student who does not have an asthma diagnosis.(2) A school employe who is not a licensed health care practitioner may decline to be designated by a school entity as an employe responsible for storing, providing or administering short-acting asthma medication.(3) If a school employe who is not a licensed health care practitioner agrees to be designated by a school entity as an employe responsible for storing, providing or administering short-acting asthma medication under subsection (a), the employe shall receive biennial training, including storing, providing and administering short-acting asthma medication and recognizing when a student may be having an asthma episode. The training shall be conducted during the employe's paid working hours or, if the training is conducted outside the employe's paid working hours, the employe shall be paid for participating in the training.(4) A school employe who is not a licensed health care practitioner shall not provide or administer short-acting asthma medication as defined in section 1401(18)(i) to a student.20260HB2117PN3493 - 7 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (i) Administration of an epinephrine [auto-injector] delivery system or short-acting asthma medication under this section shall comply with section 504 of the Rehabilitation Act of 1973 (Public Law 93-112, 29 U.S.C. § 794) and 22 Pa. Code Ch. 15 (relating to protected handicapped students).(j) As used in this section, "school entity" means a school district, intermediate unit, charter school, cyber charter school, regional charter school or area career and technical school.Section 1414.9. Administration of Epinephrine [Auto-injectors] Delivery Systems or Short-Acting Asthma Medications by School Bus Drivers and School Crossing Guards.--The provisions of 42 Pa.C.S. §§ 8332 (relating to emergency response provider and bystander good Samaritan civil immunity) and 8337.1 (relating to civil immunity of school officers or employees relating to emergency care, first aid and rescue) shall apply to a school bus driver and a school crossing guard when all of the following apply:(1) The school bus driver or school crossing guard administers an epinephrine [auto-injector] delivery system or short-acting asthma medication to a student in a manner consistent with the policies established by all of the following:* * *Section 3. This act shall take effect in 90 days.20260HB2117PN3493 - 8 - 12345678910111213141516171819202122232425